District of Columbia statutes.
48-907.02

Repealed

Funding and disbursements.

Repealed.

Aug. 5, 1981, D.C. Law 4-29, § 702
as added June 13, 1990, D.C. Law 8-138, § 2(f), 37 DCR 2638
Sept. 26, 1992, D.C. Law 9-155, § 2(b), 39 DCR 5679
Sept. 26, 1995, D.C. Law 11-52, § 809(a), 42 DCR 3684
Sept. 20, 2012, D.C. Law 19-168, § 8004, 59 DCR 8025
This section is referenced in § 23-532.
1981 Ed., § 33-572.
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 804(a) of Multiyear Budget Spending Reduction and Support Temporary Act of 1995 (D.C. Law 10-253, March 23, 1995, law notification 42 DCR 1652).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 8004 of Fiscal Year 2013 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-383, June 19, 2012, 59 DCR 7764).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 8004 of Fiscal Year 2013 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-413, July 25, 2012, 59 DCR 9290).
Section 8010 of D.C. Law 19-168 provided that §§ 8002, 8003, 8004, 8005, 8006, and 8007 of the act shall apply as of September 14, 2011.